Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 5. County Aid in Certain Counties.

§ 69-27-201.
Designated counties authorized to aid soil erosion work.

For the purpose of preventing soil erosion and its accompanying evils in Attala, Carroll, Claiborne, Clay, Copiah, Forrest, Franklin, George, Greene, Grenada, Hancock, Harrison, Holmes, Humphreys, Itawamba, Jackson, Kemper, Lamar, Leake, Lee, Madison, Monroe, Neshoba, Oktibbeha, Pearl River, Pike, Prentiss, Rankin, Scott, Stone, Tishomingo, Union, Warren and Webster Counties, Mississippi, so far as possible, said counties are hereby authorized to declare it to be the policy of the county to encourage and assist owners of land therein to properly terrace and ditch their agricultural lands, and cooperate with the federal government in soil erosion work.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4966; Laws, 1938, ch. 285.

§ 69-27-203.
Soil erosion committee.

The director of the state extension service, the director of the state agricultural and forestry experiment station, and the state forester of the State of Mississippi shall, on written application of any five or more landowners of said county, owning an aggregate of not less than seventy-five hundred acres of land therein, appoint a soil erosion committee for said county, to consist of three members, each to be over twenty-five years of age and the record owner of not less than one hundred and sixty acres of land within the county. The term of each member of said committee shall be five years from the date of his appointment, but any member may be removed from office as other public officers and the term of any member of said committee shall cease, if he fails to maintain his ownership of the requisite one hundred and sixty acres of land in the county. Vacancies on said committee shall be filled for a term of five years by appointment in the same manner as the original members were appointed. The members of said committee shall receive no pay for the services to be performed hereunder, but one member of said committee shall be designated by it as secretary of the committee, who shall be paid his reasonable expense out of the soil erosion funds herein provided for, by order of the board of supervisors, upon certificate of the committee.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4967; Laws, 1938, ch. 285.

§ 69-27-205.
Soil erosion committees; duties, etc.

It shall be the duty of said soil erosion committee to cooperate with the county agent in all matters pertaining to soil erosion work within the county, and with all agencies of the state or federal government engaged in the prevention of soil erosion; to assist the county agent, or any other agency, state or federal, in obtaining contracts from landowners for terracing and/or ditching of agricultural lands within the county; to recommend to the board of supervisors the purchase of proper machinery and supplies for ditching and terracing work, either or both; to approve in their discretion all contemplated purchases of such machinery by the board of supervisors, after bids have been received therefor and before contracts have been let by said board for the purchase thereof; to approve in their discretion all contracts or agreements made by the board of supervisors for the employment of labor to operate said machinery before the same shall become operative; to approve the rate which each landowner shall pay for the terracing and/or ditching of his land, to be included in the contract therefor, and to supervise the performance of all such contracts; to personally audit at least once each year the soil erosion fund or funds of the county; and to make recommendations to the board of supervisors pertaining to the administration of such fund, and the amount of taxes, if any, necessary to be levied to maintain the same. Nothing in this section contained shall apply to the purchase of machinery or the employment of labor except for soil erosion and ditching work hereunder.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4968; Laws, 1938, ch. 285.

§ 69-27-207.
Contracts between county and owner; benefit payments.

All contracts entered into hereunder between a county designated in Section 69-27-201 and an owner of land therein for the terracing and/or ditching thereof shall be in such legal form as may be approved by the attorney for the board of supervisors, and each such contract, before becoming effective, shall contain a legal description of the land, shall be signed in his own behalf by the owner of the land, and if the property contained in such description be a part of the homestead of such owner, by the husband or wife, as the case may be, before at least two witnesses, and properly proved for recording, or acknowledged before some officer authorized to accept acknowledgments, shall be approved in writing by the secretary of the soil erosion committee, and shall be accepted by the board of supervisors, by order upon its minutes setting forth the date of the contract and the name of the landowner. Any number of such contracts may be accepted in one order, but no such contract shall be accepted unless all taxes theretofore becoming due and payable on the land therein described have been paid. Upon the acceptance of such contract or contracts, the clerk of the board of supervisors, acting in his official capacity as chancery clerk, shall note upon the lis pendens record the name of such landowner, together with a description of the land contained in such contract, which listing shall be notice to any subsequent purchaser or incumbrancer. Any subsequent transaction concerning such land shall be by reason of such listing and such notice subject to any and all assessments which may thereafter be made by virtue of such contract. All such contracts so accepted shall remain binding upon the signers thereof unless cancelled by an order of the board of supervisors, either of its own motion or by mutual agreement with the then owner of the land. The county shall not be liable for damages or otherwise because of its cancellation of any such contract, or its failure to perform the same; and the owner of the land shall not be required to make any payment under such contract unless and until the work to be done thereunder has been completed. The amount to be paid by the owner of the land for the work to be done under any such contract may at his option be paid in one payment on or before the 1st day of February following the completion thereof, or in not more than four equal annual payments, the first payment to be due on the first day of February following completion of the work, and one on the first day of February in each year thereafter until all are paid, with six per cent (6%) interest from the maturity date of the first payment; but such option shall be exercised in advance, and the terms of payment stated in the contract. All payments under such contracts shall be made to the tax collector of the county, for the benefit of a soil erosion fund or funds, to be collected, accounted for, paid in, and commissions charged thereon by the tax collector, as in case of other taxes collected for the county, except that sales of land for default in such payments shall be as herein provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4969; Laws, 1938, ch. 285.

§ 69-27-209.
Machinery and equipment; how purchased; operation; election on question of purchase.

[With regard to any county which is exempt from the provisions of Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

The board of supervisors of a county as designated in Section 69-27-201 may, on the recommendation of the soil erosion committee, or shall, if so required by the election hereinafter provided for, advertise for bids as in other cases and purchase the proper terracing and/or ditching machinery, either for the county as a whole or for any one or more supervisors districts thereof as a soil erosion district, and provide the necessary labor for the operation thereof, and the necessary supplies and maintenance to properly operate the same, subject, however, to the approval of the soil erosion committee herein otherwise provided. In event the board of supervisors shall fail or refuse to advertise for bids for the purchase of any machinery recommended by said soil erosion committee within sixty (60) days after receipt of such recommendation, it shall, on the filing with it of a petition signed by ten percent (10%) or more of the qualified electors of the county as a whole, or of one or more supervisors districts as the petition may provide, call and hold as in other cases a special election in said county, or in such one or more supervisors districts, within sixty (60) days after the filing of the petition, in which election the question shall be, for or against the purchase of terracing and/or ditching machinery for the county, or for one or more supervisors districts as the case may be; and if a majority of the votes cast in said election be in favor of the purchase of such machinery, then said board shall, at its next meeting, advertise for bids for the purchase thereof, and thereafter further perform the duties required of it hereunder with respect to soil erosion work. Such advertisement for bids shall constitute notice to the public of the intention of the board to make such purchase and the board may proceed accordingly unless on or before the first day of the meeting at which said bids are to be opened a petition, signed by twenty percent (20%) or more of the qualified electors of the county, exclusive of those who pay poll tax only, or if the soil erosion district is composed of one or more supervisors districts then of twenty percent (20%) or more of such soil erosion district, shall be filed with the clerk of the board protesting against such purchase, in which event such purchase shall not be made unless approved in an election called and held for the purpose in the manner provided for the calling and holding of elections on the question of the issuance of tax anticipation note or notes. Said board shall have full supervision of all soil erosion work, the machinery, labor, supplies, contracts, and the funds arising from work performed, from taxation, if any, or otherwise, except to the extent herein otherwise specifically provided; and in administering the soil erosion fund the board shall take into consideration the repairs and replacements incident to the operation of the character of machinery in use in order that the work may continue without undue interruption as long as may be necessary. In event machinery be purchased hereunder for soil erosion districts composed of one or more supervisors districts, but less than the whole county, then the soil erosion fund shall be administered in one or more subdivisions as may be necessary, so as to keep separate the operations of the several soil erosion districts of the county, and the taxes levied, if any, shall likewise be levied upon said separate soil erosion districts, in the same manner as for separate road districts; and for these purposes such separate soil erosion districts may be designated by name or number, to be declared by the board. All acts and proceedings of the board with respect to soil erosion work and the funds thereof shall be by order upon its minutes, as in other cases. Contracts for terracing and/or ditching shall be performed as nearly as possible in the order of their dates, any deviation therefrom by reason of necessity, public convenience, causes beyond the control of the committee, or agreement with the landowners, to be under the direction of the soil erosion committee. Only one (1) committee shall be appointed in said county, regardless of the number of soil erosion districts in operation therein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4970; Laws, 1938, ch. 285; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 58, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 69-27-209.
Machinery and equipment; how purchased; operation; election on question of purchase.

[With regard to any county which is required to operate on a countywide system of road administration as described in Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

The board of supervisors of a county as designated in Section 69-27-201 may, on the recommendation of the soil erosion committee, or shall, if so required by the election hereinafter provided for, advertise for bids as in other cases and purchase the proper terracing and/or ditching machinery for the county and provide the necessary labor for the operation thereof, and the necessary supplies and maintenance to properly operate the same, subject, however, to the approval of the soil erosion committee herein otherwise provided. In event the board of supervisors shall fail or refuse to advertise for bids for the purchase of any machinery recommended by said soil erosion committee within sixty (60) days after receipt of such recommendation, it shall, on the filing with it of a petition signed by ten percent (10%) or more of the qualified electors of the county, call and hold as in other cases a special election in said county within sixty (60) days after the filing of the petition, in which election the question shall be, for or against the purchase of terracing and/or ditching machinery for the county; and if a majority of the votes cast in said election be in favor of the purchase of such machinery, then said board shall, at its next meeting, advertise for bids for the purchase thereof, and thereafter further perform the duties required of it hereunder with respect to soil erosion work. Such advertisement for bids shall constitute notice to the public of the intention of the board to make such purchase and the board may proceed accordingly unless on or before the first day of the meeting at which said bids are to be opened a petition, signed by twenty percent (20%) or more of the qualified electors of the county, shall be filed with the clerk of the board protesting against such purchase, in which event such purchase shall not be made unless approved in an election called and held for the purpose in the manner provided for the calling and holding of elections on the question of the issuance of tax anticipation note or notes. Said board shall have full supervision of all soil erosion work, the machinery, labor, supplies, contracts, and the funds arising from work performed, from taxation, if any, or otherwise, except to the extent herein otherwise specifically provided; and in administering the soil erosion fund the board shall take into consideration the repairs and replacements incident to the operation of the character of machinery in use in order that the work may continue without undue interruption as long as may be necessary. All acts and proceedings of the board with respect to soil erosion work and the funds thereof shall be by order upon its minutes, as in other cases. Contracts for terracing and/or ditching shall be performed as nearly as possible in the order of their dates, any deviation therefrom by reason of necessity, public convenience, causes beyond the control of the committee, or agreement with the landowners, to be under the direction of the soil erosion committee. Only one (1) committee shall be appointed in said county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4970; Laws, 1938, ch. 285; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 58, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 69-27-211.
Machinery and equipment; contracts with owners must be first obtained; additional machinery.

The soil erosion committee shall not, except as herein otherwise provided, make recommendation to the board for the purchase of the first machinery for said county, or part of the county, unless it has contracts in the form herein required, signed by the landowners, duly witnessed, and approved by the secretary of the committee, covering at least seventy-five hundred acres of land, which, however, shall justify the purchase of as many as three outfits of machinery; and thereafter the subsequent contracts made in said county, or part of the county, shall be allocated to the first machinery purchased therefor, until the whole amount reaches a total of not less than four thousand acres to each outfit. Should the committee thereafter obtain or have additional like contracts in said county, or part of the county, covering another four thousand acres or more, the same shall warrant the purchase of additional machinery by recommendation or election as herein provided; and this shall furnish the guide for all further purchases in said county or part of the county. In exceptional cases, where the board finds as a fact that the amount of work to be done upon the land is much greater than in ordinary cases, the board of supervisors may, with the unanimous consent of the soil erosion committee, reduce the amount of contract acreage necessary for the purchase of one outfit of machinery to not less than two thousand acres, and the amount of contract acreage to be allocated to one outfit of machinery to not less than three thousand acres, and the committee may then recommend purchases of machinery when those conditions are complied with, provided that not less than two outfits are owned or to be purchased by said county or part of the county under this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4971; Laws, 1938, ch. 285.

§ 69-27-213.
Machinery and equipment; certificates of indebtedness for; tax levy; payment of expenses.

The board of supervisors shall have the right to issue certificates of indebtedness of the county for the purchase price of the necessary machinery for soil erosion work hereunder, or any part of such price, to be paid from the soil erosion fund of the county or part of the county for which such machinery is purchased, which certificates shall be payable in no more than three annual instalments, the first of which in the case of two instalments to be not less than one-half of the aggregate certificates issued for that purchase, and the first two of which in the case of three instalments to be for not less than one-third each of such aggregate, the first instalment in any case to be payable on the first Monday in April of the year following that in which the certificates are issued, and subsequent instalment on the first Monday in April each succeeding year. By its order purchasing such machinery the board may provide for the payment of interest at a rate of not more than six per cent (6%) per annum upon the deferred payments evidenced by said certificates, in which event said certificates shall show upon their face that fact, and shall be payable with interest accordingly; and said certificates shall also show upon their face the date when and the purpose for which issued, the principal amount of the certificate, the aggregate amount of the certificates issued for that particular purchase, the date when payable, and whether payable from the soil erosion fund of the whole county or of some named or numbered soil erosion district thereof; and all such certificates shall be signed by the president of the board, shall be countersigned by the clerk thereof, shall have the seal of the county impressed thereon, and shall be registered by the clerk when issued as is required in the case of bonds, and may be validated as such. The board shall also make appropriate provision, by budget and tax levy as in other cases, to so govern and supplement the soil erosion fund arising from performance of contracts for landowners, as to make prompt payments of all bills for labor, fuel, oil, supplies, repairs and other necessary cost and expenses incident to the operation of said machinery, the performance of said contracts, and the carrying out of the provisions hereof, and prompt payment of the certificates of indebtedness issued for the purchase of machinery, with interest, if any, as and when due. The board may also borrow money for the county in anticipation of taxes and the special assessments herein provided for, for the payment of current operating expenses of soil erosion work, as in case of other current operating expenses, the same to be paid out of the soil erosion fund, supplemented if necessary by a special tax as in other cases. Money so borrowed, as well as the certificates of indebtedness issued for the purchase of machinery, shall be a liability of the county until paid. The certificates herein provided for shall not be taken into consideration under any debt limitation statute.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4972; Laws, 1938, ch. 285.

§ 69-27-215.
Notice of completion of contracts; special improvement tax; lien; lump sum payment, etc.

It shall be the duty of the soil erosion committee to notify the board of supervisors, the county assessor and the landowner within fifteen days after the performance of each contract by the county or separate soil erosion district, giving the assessor the name of the landowner, the legal description of the land, the amount to be paid to the county or district, and how payable, and to the landowner a notice that a special assessment will be made against his land by the assessor for the amount determined by the committee, and presented to the next meeting of the board of supervisors beginning more than ten days thereafter for approval. The assessor shall, at the next meeting of the board beginning more than ten days after such notice, file with the board of supervisors, in duplicate, on appropriate forms, keeping a copy thereof on file in his own office, an assessment of the land for a special improvement tax thereon equal to the amount fixed by the committee, and payable as provided by the contract. It shall be the duty of the board of supervisors at said meeting to hear any objections to such assessment, by the landowner or the holder of any lien thereon, and to determine the amount of the assessment, not to exceed the amount fixed by the committee, and to approve the assessment as finally determined. The clerk of the board shall forthwith certify such assessment to the tax collector of the county upon the duplicate of the assessment filed by the assessor. In event such assessment be not returned to or acted upon by the board at the first meeting for any reason, it may be returned, considered and acted upon at any subsequent meeting. When approved, such assessment shall be a lien upon the land subordinate only to the lien of other taxes, prior and subsequent, and no delay or irregularity in the giving of notices, the making of the assessment, the hearing and approval thereof, or the certification thereof to the tax collector, shall affect the validity of the assessment if the work was actually done upon the land and the amount of the assessment does not exceed the contract price. Appeals may be taken to the circuit court of the county as in other cases of assessments for taxation, by the landowner or the holder of any lien upon the land. Nothing herein contained shall prevent any landowner from making payment to the tax collector of the estimated amount to become due under his contract, or any part thereof, in advance of the time the same becomes due, and the tax collector shall receive any payment so tendered, and give the landowner credit therefor against the assessment when made.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4973; Laws, 1938, ch. 285.

§ 69-27-217.
Tax collector’s role; collection of assessment; sale of land for non-payment; redemption.

It shall be the duty of the tax collector to preserve all assessments so certified to him, to note upon the real property assessment roll of the county or county district upon which ad valorem taxes are to be collected for the year in which said work was done, the fact that said land is subject to a special soil erosion fund tax, and to collect with the other taxes payable on February first, giving a separate receipt therefor, the amount of the special soil erosion fund tax then due accordingly, and to so continue from year to year until such a special tax has been paid in full. If said special tax was to be paid in one payment within one year after completion of the work, the assessment shall be made accordingly, and the tax shall be then payable, and shall be collected at the time shown by the assessment. In event said tax or any part thereof is not paid when due, the tax collector shall advertise and sell the land liable therefor as in the case of lands sold for the non-payment of drainage district taxes, and all provisions of law applicable to such drainage district tax sales shall be applied in the case of soil erosion fund tax sales, except that if there are no other bidders the soil erosion committee shall become the purchaser on behalf of and in the name of the county, a sale or sales may be made on the first Monday of any month, and such sales shall be subordinate to all other sales of taxes, prior or subsequent, to the same extent as sales for other special improvements. For the protection of its rights hereunder, any of said counties may redeem from sale of any such lands to the state after any tax sale thereof by payment to the state of the state taxes with damages thereon and costs of sale.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4974; Laws, 1938, ch. 285.

§ 69-27-219.
No contracts on incumbered land.

No contract shall be approved by the soil erosion committee of any of said counties designated in Section 69-27-201, concerning any lands whereon there is any lien of any character whatever, except lien for current taxes, unless the holder of such lien shall have first approved such contract, and such approval shall operate as a waiver of such lien in favor of and in subordination to any subsequent special assessment made in accordance herewith.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4975; Laws, 1938, ch. 285.

§ 69-27-221.
Price of equipment.

No bids for furnishing equipment under the provisions of this article may be considered or accepted by any county, unless said bid is the factory list price plus a reasonable delivery charge.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4976; Laws, 1938, ch. 285.

§ 69-27-223.
Additional equipment not purchased until.

In the event of a tax levy being made to pay the purchase price of any equipment purchased under this article, the county shall not be authorized to purchase any additional equipment until enough money has been collected from the use of equipment already purchased, sufficient to pay back into the county treasury the full amount collected by such tax levy.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4977; Laws, 1938, ch. 285.